Washington statutes.
RCW 27.12.010

Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

(1) "Governmental unit" means any county, city, town, rural county library district, intercounty rural library district, rural partial-county library district, or island library district;

(2) "Intercounty rural library district" means a municipal corporation organized to provide library service for all areas outside of incorporated cities and towns within two or more counties: PROVIDED, That any city or town meeting the population requirements of RCW 27.12.360 may be included therein as provided in RCW 27.12.360 through 27.12.390;

(3) "Island library district" means a municipal corporation organized to provide library service for all areas outside of incorporated cities and towns on a single island only, and not all of the area of the county, in counties composed entirely of islands and having a population of less than twenty-five thousand at the time the island library district was created: PROVIDED, That any city or town meeting the population requirements of RCW 27.12.360 may be included therein as provided in RCW 27.12.360 through 27.12.390;

(4) "Legislative body" means the body authorized to determine the amount of taxes to be levied in a governmental unit; in rural county library districts, in intercounty rural library districts, and in island library districts, the legislative body shall be the board of library trustees of the district;

(5) "Library" means a free public library supported in whole or in part with money derived from taxation;

(6) "Regional library" means a free public library maintained by two or more counties or other governmental units as provided in RCW 27.12.080;

(7) "Rural county library district" means a library serving all the area of a county not included within the area of incorporated cities and towns: PROVIDED, That any city or town meeting the population requirements of RCW 27.12.360 may be included therein as provided in RCW 27.12.360 through 27.12.390; and

(8) "Rural partial-county library district" means a municipal corporation organized to provide library service for a portion of the unincorporated area of a county. Any city or town located in the same county as a rural partial-county library district may annex to the district if the city or town has a population of one hundred thousand or less at the time of annexation.

[ 2009 c 40 s 2; 1994 c 198 s 1; 1993 c 284 s 2; 1982 c 123 s 1; 1981 c 26 s 1; 1977 ex.s. c 353 s 5; 1965 c 122 s 1; 1947 c 75 s 10; 1941 c 65 s 1; 1935 c 119 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 8226-2.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: The definitions in this section have been alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k).